Massachusetts, session 194th, H1170.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 32A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 17O, as inserted by chapter 233 of the acts 2016, the following section:-
Section 17P. Any coverage offered by the commission to an active or retired employee of
the commonwealth insured under the group insurance commission that provides coverage for
cancer chemotherapy treatment shall provide coverage for physical therapy preventative,
ongoing chronic maintenance, and acute treatment for Ehler Danlos Syndrome patients.
SECTION 2. Chapter 175 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 47II, as inserted by chapter 233 of the acts 2016, the following section:-
of 3

Section 47JJ. Any policy, contract, agreement, plan or certificate of insurance issued,
delivered or renewed within the commonwealth that provides medical expense coverage shall
provide for preventative, ongoing chronic maintenance and acute treatment physical therapy for
Ehler Danlos Syndrome patients when determined to be medically necessary and ordered by a
physician after making a thorough evaluation of the patient’s symptoms, diagnostic test results or
response to therapy. Therapy otherwise eligible for benefits pursuant to this section shall not be
denied solely because such therapy may be characterized as unproven, experimental, or
investigational in nature.
SECTION 3. Chapter 176A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 8KK, as inserted by chapter 233 of the acts 2016, the following section:-
Section 8LL. Any contract between a subscriber and the corporation under an individual
or group hospital service plan which is delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth
shall provide coverage for preventative, ongoing chronic maintenance and acute treatment
physical therapy for Ehler Danlos Syndrome patients when determined to be medically necessary
and ordered by a physician after making a thorough evaluation of the patient’s symptoms,
diagnostic test results or response to therapy. Therapy otherwise eligible for benefits pursuant to
this section shall not be denied solely because such therapy may be characterized as unproven,
experimental, or investigational in nature.
SECTION 4. Chapter 176B of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 4KK, as inserted by chapter 233 of the acts 2016, the following section:-
Section 4LL. Any subscription certificate under an individual or group medical service
agreement delivered, issued, or renewed within the Commonwealth shall provide coverage for
of 3

preventative, ongoing chronic maintenance and acute treatment physical therapy for Ehler
Danlos Syndrome patients when determined to be medically necessary and ordered by a
physician after making a thorough evaluation of the patient’s symptoms, diagnostic test results
and response in therapy. Therapy otherwise eligible for benefits pursuant to this section shall not
be denied solely because such therapy may be characterized as unproven, experimental, or
investigational in nature.
SECTION 5. Chapter 176G of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 4CC, as inserted by chapter 233 of the acts 2016, the following section:-
Section 4DD. Any individual or group health maintenance contract shall provide
coverage for preventative, ongoing chronic maintenance and acute treatment physical therapy for
Ehler Danlos Syndrome patients when determined to be medically necessary and ordered by a
physician after making a thorough evaluation of the patient’s symptoms, diagnostic test results
and response in therapy. Therapy otherwise eligible for benefits pursuant to this section shall not
be denied solely because such therapy may be characterized as unproven, experimental, or
investigational in nature.
of 3